California statutes. Education Code
(a) A community college allied health program that determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity may admit students in accordance with any of the following procedures:

(1) Administration of a multicriteria screening process, if authorized by Section 78263.2, in a manner that is consistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) A random selection process.

(3) A blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process.

(b) A community college allied health program that elects to use a multicriteria
 screening process, including a blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process, to evaluate applicants pursuant to this article shall apply those measures in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The criteria applied in a multicriteria screening process under this article shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following criteria:

(A) Academic degrees or diplomas, or relevant certificates, held by an applicant.

(B) Grade point average in relevant coursework.

(C) Any relevant work or volunteer experience.

(D) Life experiences or special circumstances of an applicant, including, but not limited to, any, or any combination of, the following
 experiences or circumstances:

(i) Disabilities.

(ii) Low family income.

(iii) First generation of family to attend college.

(iv) Need to work.

(v) Disadvantaged social or educational environment.

(vi) Difficult personal and family situations or circumstances.

(vii) Refugee or veteran status.

(viii) Living in a medically underserved area or population, as designated by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration.

(E) Proficiency or advanced level coursework in languages other than English. Credit for languages other than English shall be received for languages that are identified by the chancellor as high-frequency languages, as based on census data. These languages may include, but are not limited to, any of the following languages:

(i) American Sign Language.

(ii) Arabic.

(iii) Chinese, including its various dialects.

(iv) Farsi.

(v) Russian.

(vi) Spanish.

(vii) Tagalog.

(viii) The various
 languages of the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia.

(ix) The various languages of the African continent.

(2) Additional criteria, such as a personal interview, a personal statement, letter of recommendation, or the number of repetitions of prerequisite classes, or other criteria, as approved by the chancellor, may be used, but are not required.

(3) A community college allied health program using a multicriteria screening process under this article may use an approved diagnostic assessment tool, in accordance with Section 78263.2, before, during, or after the multicriteria screening process.

(c) A community college allied health program that uses a multicriteria screening process pursuant to this article shall report its allied health program
 admissions policies to the chancellor annually, in writing. The admissions policies reported under this subdivision shall include the weight given to any criteria used by the program, and shall include demographic information relating to both the persons admitted to the program and the persons of that group who successfully completed that program.

(d) The chancellor is encouraged to develop and make available to community college allied health programs by July 1, 2025, a model admissions process based on this section.

(e) (1) The chancellor shall submit a report on or before December 31, 2026, and
 on or before December 31 triennially thereafter, to the Legislature and the Governor that examines and includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(A) The participation, retention, and completion rates in community college allied health programs of students admitted through a multicriteria screening process, as described in this section, disaggregated by the age, gender, ethnicity, and, if available, the language spoken at the home of those students.

(B) Information on the annual impact, if any, the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210), had on the matriculation
 services for students admitted through the multicriteria screening process, as described in this section.

(2) The chancellor may incorporate the triennial report required in paragraph (1) into the triennial report required by subdivision (d) of Section 78261.5.

(3) The chancellor shall submit the triennial
 report required in paragraph (1) in conjunction with its triennial report required by subdivision (h) of Section 78261.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Disabilities” has the same meaning as used in Section 2626 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) “Disadvantaged social or educational environment” includes, but is not limited to, the status of a student who has participated in Extended Opportunity Programs and Services.

(3) “Grade point average” refers to the same fixed set of required prerequisite courses that all applicants to the allied health program administering the multicriteria screening process are required to complete.

(4) “Low family income” shall be measured by a community college allied health program in terms of a student’s eligibility for, or receipt of, financial aid under a program that may include, but is not limited to, a fee waiver from the board of governors under Section 76300, the Cal Grant Program under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5, the federal Pell Grant program, or CalWORKs.

(5) “Need to work” means that the student is working at least part time while completing academic work
 that is a prerequisite for admission to the allied health program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 19.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Sec. 78263.3.)
-------------------------------------------

78263.2.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) A community college district may use any diagnostic assessment tool that is commonly used in allied health programs and is approved by the chancellor.

(b) If, after using an approved diagnostic assessment tool, a community college allied health program determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity, the program may use additional multicriteria screening measures. This subdivision does not prohibit or prevent a community college allied health program from using an approved diagnostic assessment tool before or during a multicriteria screening process.

(c) A community college district shall not do either of the following:

(1) Exclude an applicant to an allied health program on the basis that the applicant is not a resident of that district or has not completed prerequisite courses in that district.

(2) Implement policies, procedures, and systems, including, but not limited to, priority registration systems, that have the effect of excluding an applicant or student who is not a resident of that district from an allied health program of that district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Sec. 78263.3.)
-------------------------------------------

78263.3.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repeal affects Article 3.54, commencing with Section 78263.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Aviation [78271. - 78271.]

78271.

The State Department of Transportation is authorized to make available to community colleges offering actual flight experience as part of the regular curriculum a basic insurance program and to ensure that adequate supervision and precautionary measures are taken by the flight school operators contracted to provide services for community college students. The governing board of any community college district offering actual flight experience as part of the regular curriculum may participate in the basic insurance program provided by the department, and pay from the funds of the district a pro rata share of the cost of the insurance program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 20.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Teacher Preparation Programs [78275. - 78275.]

78275.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) There is a significant teacher shortage in California and the nation.

(2) The teacher shortage is exacerbated by the lack of minority teacher candidates.

(3) In California, it is estimated that there will be a shortfall of between 260,000 and 300,000 teachers during the first decade of the 21st century. Nationwide, the teacher shortfall is estimated to be between 2,000,000 and 2,200,000 during that same timeframe.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to create a larger pool of potential teachers in California by establishing a teacher preparation curriculum in the California Community Colleges, expanding financial incentives for community college students who wish to become teachers, and guaranteeing the transfer of students who successfully complete the community college teacher preparation curriculum to appropriate status in teacher preparation programs of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Community Service Classes [78300. - 78300.]

78300.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may, without the approval of the board of governors, establish and maintain community service classes in civic, vocational, literacy, health, family and consumer sciences, technical, and general education, including, but not limited to, classes in the fields of visual and performing arts, handicraft, science, literature, nature study, nature contacting, aquatic sports, and athletics. These classes shall be designed to provide instruction and to contribute to the physical, mental, moral, economic, or civic development of the individuals or groups enrolled in them.

(b) Community service classes shall be open for the admission of adults and of those minors who, in the judgment of the governing board, may profit
 from them.

(c) Governing boards shall not expend General Fund moneys to establish and maintain community service classes. Governing boards may charge students enrolled in community service classes a fee not to exceed the cost of maintaining community service classes, or may provide instruction in community service classes for remuneration by contract, or with contributions or donations of individuals or groups. The board of governors shall adopt guidelines defining the acceptable reimbursable costs for which a fee may be charged, and shall collect data and maintain uniform accounting procedures to ensure that General Fund moneys are not used for community service classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 99.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Adult Schools [78401. - 78402.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [78401. - 78402.]

78401.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may, with the approval of the board of governors, establish and maintain classes for adults for the purpose of providing instruction in civic, vocational, literacy, health, family and consumer sciences, technical, and general education.

(b) Classes for adults shall conform to any course of study and graduation requirements otherwise imposed by law or under the authority of law.

(c) Classes for adults shall be open for the admission of adults and of any minors who, in the judgment of the governing board, may be qualified for admission to them.

(d) The board of governors shall
 establish standards, including standards of attendance, curriculum, administration, and guidance and counseling service for classes for adults as a basis for the several apportionments of state funds provided for the support of these classes.

(e) The governing board of a community college district maintaining an adult school shall prescribe the requirements for the granting of diplomas.

(f) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges and the State Department of Education shall coordinate so that students enrolled in classes established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be assigned a statewide student identifier consistent with the identifiers assigned to pupils in K–12 education programs, if the student is not already identified by a social security number in a community college district’s data system. For a student who
 formerly attended a California public school in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or participated in another adult education program, the same statewide student identifier utilized for that student in the past programs shall be assigned. The chancellor’s office shall collect and maintain the identifiers of adult school students in the Adult Education Program data system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 100.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

78402.

(a) The chancellor’s office, in conjunction with the department, as part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall jointly develop and issue assessment policy recommendations regarding assessments to be used by school districts and community college districts for purposes of placement in adult education courses offered pursuant to Section 84830 and paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 84757.

(b) The department and the chancellor’s office, as a part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall jointly develop and issue policy recommendations to the Legislature regarding a comprehensive accountability system for adult education courses offered pursuant to Section 84830 and paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 84757. The department and the chancellor’s office shall develop recommendations for all adult education-funded providers for assessment, evaluation, and data collection to document participant outcomes and placement, and other performance measures they deem appropriate. Accountability measures may include receipt of a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, placement in a postsecondary educational institution, training, and employment. All funded programs shall
 be required to annually submit demographic and other student-level outcome information to the department or the chancellor’s office, as appropriate.

(c) The chancellor’s office, in conjunction with the department, and as a part of the report and recommendations required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 84830, shall coordinate and issue both of the following:

(1) Recommendations, including recommendations as to whether or not fees should be assessed, and fee policy guidelines to be used by school districts and community college districts regarding the authority to charge fees for courses offered pursuant to Section 84830. With respect to these recommendations and guidelines, it is the intent of the Legislature that:

(A) Registration and course fees should be equivalent across all programs.

(B) Fees should not generate income beyond the cost of providing the courses.

(C) Fees should not create a barrier to student access to adult education programs.

(2) Recommendations and policy guidelines regarding the use of a single student identifier to be used by school districts and community college districts for purposes of developing a comprehensive accountability system pursuant to the requirements of Section 84830.

(d) As used in this section, “department” means the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (SB 173)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Instructional Materials [78900. - 78907.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prohibited Acts [78900. - 78907.]

78900.

(a) No publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials, nor any of his or her representatives, shall offer or give any emolument, money, or other valuable thing, or any inducement, to any community college official to directly or indirectly introduce, recommend, vote for, or otherwise influence the adoption or purchase of any instructional material.

(b) No community college official shall accept any emolument, money, or other valuable thing, or any inducement to directly or indirectly introduce, recommend, vote for, or otherwise influence the adoption or purchase of any instructional material.

(c) Any publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials or his or her representative, or any community college official who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any community college official who violates this article shall, in addition to any other penalty, be removed from his or her official position.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any publisher, manufacturer, or agent from supplying for purposes of examination necessary sample copies of instructional materials to any community college official.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a community college official from receiving sample copies of instructional materials.

(f) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict a community college official from receiving royalties or other compensation from the publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials written, designed, or prepared by the community college official, and adopted or purchased by any governing board, other than compensation paid as a commission to the community college official for negotiating sales to governing boards. No district shall have or claim the right to receive a royalty or other compensation due to any community college official employed by the district unless the instructional material was written or prepared during the normal schoolday during which the community college official is required by the district to be on duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 503.)
-------------------------------------------

78907.

The use by any person, including a student, of any electronic listening or recording device in any classroom without the prior consent of the instructor is prohibited, except as necessary to provide reasonable auxiliary aids and academic adjustments to disabled students. Any person, other than a student, who willfully violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any student violating this section shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action.

This section shall not be construed as affecting the powers, rights, and liabilities arising from the use of electronic listening or recording devices as provided for by any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 509.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. College Terms [79020. - 79030.]



  ARTICLE 3. Holidays and Observances [79020. - 79030.]

79020.

Except as otherwise provided, the community colleges shall continue in session or close on specified holidays as follows:

(a) The community colleges shall close on January 1, the third Monday in January, commencing in the 1989–90 fiscal year, known as “Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day,” February 12 known as “Lincoln Day,” the third Monday in February known as “Washington Day,” the last Monday in May known as “Memorial Day,” July 4, the first Monday in September known as “Labor Day,” November 11 known as “Veterans Day,” that Thursday in November proclaimed by the President as “Thanksgiving Day,” and December 25.

(b) Any contractual provision between any community college district and its employees in effect on the effective
 date of the act that adds this subdivision shall prevail over any conflict regarding Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day until the termination date of the contract or upon termination by mutual agreement of the parties, whichever occurs first.

(c) The Governor in appointing any other day for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday may provide whether the community colleges shall close on the day. If the Governor does not provide whether the community colleges shall close, they shall continue in session on all special or limited holidays appointed by the Governor, but shall close on all other days appointed by the Governor for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday.

(d) (1) The community colleges shall close on every day appointed by the President as a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday, unless it is a special or limited holiday.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “appointed by the President” includes the President signing into law legislation that creates a nationwide federal holiday, including the legal public holidays listed in subsection (a) of Section 6103 of Title 5 of the United States Code, but does not include Columbus Day. This definition is declaratory of existing law.

(e) The community colleges shall continue in session on all legal holidays other than those designated by or pursuant to this section, and shall hold proper exercises commemorating the day.

(f) When any of the holidays on which the schools would be closed fall on Sunday, the community colleges shall close on the Monday following, except that (1) if Lincoln Day falls on a Sunday, the community colleges may observe this holiday on the preceding or following Friday, the
 following Monday, or the following Tuesday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a) where applicable, or (2) if Lincoln Day falls on a Monday, the community colleges may observe this holiday on the preceding or following Friday, that Monday, or the following Tuesday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a) where applicable.

(g) When any of the holidays on which the schools would be closed, except Lincoln Day, fall on Saturday, the community colleges shall close on the preceding Friday, and that Friday shall be declared a state holiday.

(h) If any holiday on which the community colleges are required to close pursuant to subdivision (a) occurs under federal law on a date different than the date specified in subdivision (a), the governing board of any community college district may close the community colleges of the district on the date
 recognized by federal law and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a).

(i) When Veterans Day would fall on Tuesday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the preceding Monday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a). When Veterans Day would fall on Wednesday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on either the preceding Monday or the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a). When Veterans Day would fall on Thursday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a).

(j) When Lincoln Day would fall on Tuesday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the preceding Monday, the
 preceding Friday, or the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a) where appropriate. When Lincoln Day would fall on Wednesday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the preceding Monday, the preceding Friday, or the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a). When Lincoln Day would fall on Thursday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the preceding Friday or the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a). When Lincoln Day falls on Saturday, the governing board of a community college district may close the colleges on the preceding Friday or the following Friday, and maintain classes on the date specified in subdivision (a) where appropriate.

(k) In addition to the holidays specified in subdivision (a), a community college may close on March 31, known as
 “Cesar Chavez Day,” if the governing board, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close the community college for that purpose.

(l) In addition to the holidays specified in subdivision (a), a community college may close on April 24, known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” the 15th day of the month of Kartik in the Hindu lunar calendar of each year, known as “Diwali,” and the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” if the governing board, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close the community college for that purpose.

(m) In addition to the holidays specified in subdivision (a), Glendale Community College
 may close on April 24, known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” if the governing board, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close the community college for that purpose.

(n) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a community college may replace closing on February 12, Lincoln Day, or the third Monday in February, Washington Day, with the date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, known as “Lunar New Year,” if the governing board of the community college district, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close the community college for that purpose. When Lunar New Year falls on another
 holiday, the community college shall observe Lunar New Year on a preceding or following weekday.

(o) This section shall not be interpreted as authorizing a community college district governing board to maintain community colleges in its district for a lesser number of days during the college year than the minimum established by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 358, Sec. 5.   (AB 268)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

79021.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, whenever the Governor appoints any other day as a holiday and does not provide for the closing of the community colleges, but the community colleges do close, the closing shall be deemed a closing for a holiday declared by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 513.7.)
-------------------------------------------

79030.

Whenever climatic conditions of a community college district are such as to render it necessary that the colleges be closed as early in the year as possible or opened as late in the year as possible, the governing board of the community college district may maintain classes on any days other than the 25th day of December, the first day of January, the fourth day of July, and any day appointed by the President or the Governor for a public thanksgiving.

When classes are maintained on holidays pursuant to this section, proper exercises shall be held commemorating the day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 196.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous [79120. - 79520.]



  ARTICLE 1. Child Development Centers [79120. - 79121.]

79120.

The governing board of any community college district may establish and maintain a child development center on or near each community college campus pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

79121.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child under two years of age whose parent is a student, or whose parents are students, may attend child development centers consistent with the priorities established pursuant to law.

(b) Children of students attending school at a particular campus shall have first priority for attendance at a child development center at that campus.

(c) Student families, as described in Section 8263, shall pay fees according to the fee schedule established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (f) of that section.

(d) Highest priority shall be given to student families with the greatest income deficit, and lowest priority to student families with the greatest income.

(e) For the purposes of assigning eligibility priority, applicant student families shall be grouped according to the amount of their income in one-hundred-dollar ($100) monthly increments. All student families within a particular income range shall be treated as if their incomes were the same, and priority for eligibility within each particular income range shall be assigned on the following basis:

(1) Single-parent student families.

(2) Two-parent families, where both parents are students or where one parent is a student and the other is working.

(f) Student families who are recipients of public assistance shall be subject to the same assignment of priority as other student families whose incomes fall in the same income range.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Industry, Internship, Apprenticeship, and Preapprenticeship Programs [79140. - 79149.7.]

79140.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) A consensus exists among employment training professionals, economists, and industry experts concerning the serious mismatch that has developed between labor force skills and the needs of employers.

(b) Workplace skills training is most effective within a real workplace environment.

(c) Private sector industry internship, apprenticeship, and preapprenticeship models successfully focus employment training on a specific job or set of skills, thereby meeting the precise needs of the labor market.

(d) Many high-growth industries, such as new media and biotechnology, are particularly suited to worksite-based learning because skills required by those industries involve the use of costly equipment and require continual upgrading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 5.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79144.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Apprenticeship program standards” means the written document containing, among other things, all the terms and conditions for the qualification, recruitment, selection, employment and training, working conditions, wages, employee benefits, and other compensation for apprentices and all other provisions and statements, including attachments, as required by the Labor Code and by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, which, when approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, shall constitute registration of these standards and authority to conduct
 that program of apprenticeship in this state.

(b) “Apprenticeship training program” means a comprehensive plan containing, among other things, apprenticeship program standards, program regulations, related and supplemental instruction course outlines, and policy statements for the effective administration of that apprenticeship training program, in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “Internship training program” means a planned series of educational training activities, paid or unpaid, in a specific or general occupational field.

(d) “Preapprenticeship program” means a structured plan of training and studies based on industry standards that is designed to prepare individuals with the skills and competencies needed to enter an
 apprenticeship training program that has been approved pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 6.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79146.

(a) To the extent sufficient resources exist, the board of governors may establish internship training programs and actively support apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs in collaboration with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations. The board of governors may establish internship training programs pursuant to this section for only those occupations not covered by an apprenticeship training program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations before January 1, 1998.

(b) Funding allocated pursuant to Sections 79149, 79149.1, and 79149.3 shall exclusively be used for approved apprenticeship training programs and shall not be allocated for the purposes of
 preapprenticeship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 7.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.

To the extent that sufficient federal funds and other resources are available, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, in partnership with the California Community Colleges Chancellor’s Office, shall develop and implement innovative apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training demonstration projects in high-growth industries in emerging and transitioning occupations that meet local labor market needs and that are validated by current labor market data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 8.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.1.

(a) The California Apprenticeship Initiative (CAI) New and Innovative Grant Program is hereby established, under the administration of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, to create new and innovative apprenticeship opportunities in priority and emerging industry sectors or areas in which apprenticeship training is not fully established or does not exist.

(b) The chancellor shall adopt, as necessary, application procedures, forms, administrative guidelines, and other requirements for purposes of implementing and administering the California Apprenticeship Initiative (CAI) New and Innovative Grant Program.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 16304 of the Government Code,
 funds appropriated for the California Apprenticeship Initiative (CAI) New and Innovative Grant Program shall be available to the chancellor for five fiscal years beginning with the fiscal year upon which the funds are appropriated.

(d) The operation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for purposes of the California Apprenticeship Initiative (CAI) New and Innovative Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 24.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall be responsible for allocating funds for apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs in good standing and approved pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code for the community colleges.

(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds solely for the purposes of reimbursing community colleges pursuant to Section 79149.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 9.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.1.

(a) Attendance of apprentices enrolled in any class offered for community college credit by a community college in collaboration with an apprenticeship program sponsor, pursuant to Section 3074 of the Labor Code, may be reimbursed as part of the budget formula developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 or its successor section if such attendance is not reported pursuant to Section 79149.3. Attendance for an apprenticeship class reimbursed as part of the budget formula developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 or its successor section shall be reported separately to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(b) Attendance of apprentices reimbursed pursuant to subdivision
 (a) shall be reimbursed based on the number of hours of instruction provided to indentured apprentices. The attendance hours generated by credit apprenticeship courses shall be funded at the marginal credit rate determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 or its successor section.

(c) For purposes of this section, each hour of teaching time may include up to 10 minutes of passing time and breaks.

(d) The attendance hours funded pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges directly to participating community college districts that have a college or colleges that contract with apprenticeship programs pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) Reimbursements may be made under this section for instruction provided to indentured apprentices only
 if the instruction is provided by a program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(f) A community college that funds a class for the training of apprentices taught by an apprenticeship instructor other than a community college faculty member shall not claim reimbursement as part of the budget formula developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 or its successor section in accordance with subdivision (a) and instead shall claim reimbursement pursuant to Section 79149.3.

(g) A community college may limit enrollment in a community college course or course section reimbursed pursuant to this section solely to apprentices if that course or course section is required for those students as a part of a registered
 apprenticeship program with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(h) For each community college receiving reimbursement for apprenticeship hours pursuant to this section, the affected community college district shall report to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges all of the following information, for each apportionment period:

(1) The total number of full-time equivalent students generated by apprentices enrolled in community college apprenticeship courses that are reimbursed pursuant to this section.

(2) The total number of hours reimbursed for apprenticeship instruction pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The total amount of apportionment received for apprenticeship instruction reimbursed